Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-160
Joint city and school district facility; building commission; plans and specifications; personnel; compensation; contracts.

The building commission shall cause to be prepared building plans and specifications for the joint building or joint recreational and athletic field and may employ architects, engineers, and such clerical help as may be deemed necessary for the purpose of preparing such plans and specifications. The compensation of such personnel shall be fixed by the commission and shall be paid in the same proportion as determined for defraying the cost of such building or field as provided for in section 17-157. The contract for erecting the building, for the equipment, and for furnishings shall be let by the commission in the same manner as for other public buildings. The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services as members of the commission.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 5, p. 129;

Laws 1955, c. 39, § 4, p. 153;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 48.